Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act:

(1) Appropriate filing officer means (a) with respect to real property subject to a tax lien, the register of deeds of the county or counties in which the real property is situated and (b) with respect to personal property subject to a tax lien, the Secretary of State; and

(2) Any reference to tax, taxes, fee, or tax program shall be construed to include any tax, fee, or in-lieu-of-tax contribution which is imposed by the laws of this state and administered or collected and enforced by the Tax Commissioner or Commissioner of Labor, unless a tax lien is otherwise provided for by law.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 215;

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 31;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 178;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 99;

Laws 1999, LB 165, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 45;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 88.